Washington statutes.
RCW 41.06.088

State internship program—Positions exempt from chapter.

This chapter does not apply to positions under the state internship program established under RCW 43.06.410.

[ 1985 c 442 s 8.]

NOTES:

Construction—Severability—1985 c 442: See notes following RCW 43.06.410.